Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the department of ecology, local fire protection districts, the towing and recovery industry, and other entities, must develop best practices for multidiscipline responses and training for response to electric vehicle fires. At minimum, these best practices must provide guidance related to: (a) The response from law enforcement, fire agencies, and other first responders to electric vehicles involved in a collision or fire; and(b) Transporting, towing, and storing electric vehicles involved in a collision or fire.(2) The Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, must develop best practice checklists to promote interagency coordination during responses to electric vehicle fires. The checklists must, at minimum, outline the best practices developed by the Washington state patrol in subsection (1) of this section and shall be made available to all fire agencies in Washington.--- END ---